Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5542.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 105. (1) "Lessee" means a person, other than the owner, who holds an interest, other than a security interest, in real property. (2) "Lien claimant" means a person having a right to a construction lien under this act. (3) "Mobile home" means that term as defined in section 2 of the mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2302. (4) (3) "Owner" means a person holding a fee interest in real property or an equitable interest arising out of a land contract. Sec. 106. (1) "Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, association, other legal entity, or any combination of these. (2) "Professional services" means services that are customarily and legally performed by or under the supervision or responsible control of design professionals in the course of their professional practice, including, but not limited to, programming, planning, surveying, site investigation, analysis, assessment, design, preparation of drawings and specifications, and construction administration services. (3) "Project" means the aggregate of improvements contracted for by the contracting owner. (4) "Residential structure" means an individual residential condominium unit, or a residential building containing not more than 2 residential units, or a mobile home, the land on which it the residential structure is or will be located, and all appurtenances, in which the owner or lessee contracting for the improvement is residing or will reside on completion of the improvement. (5) "Subcontractor" means a person, other than a laborer or supplier, who pursuant to a contract between himself or herself the subcontractor and a person other than the owner or lessee performs any part of a contractor's contract for an improvement. (6) "Supplier" means a person who, pursuant to a contract with a contractor or a subcontractor, leases, rents, or in any other manner provides material or equipment that is used in the improvement of real property. Supplier does not include a design professional or a person that has a subcontract with a design professional as described in section 107b. (7) "Wages" means all earnings of an employee, whether determined on the basis of time, task, piece, commission, or other method of calculation, for labor or services, except fringe benefits and withholdings.